fr: Forme de la bougie: Cylindrique; Œuf; Ellipse; Rond; Carré; Autre
sl-SI: Oblika sveče: Cilindrična; Jajčasta; Elipsa; Okrogla; Kvadraten; Drugo
zh-TW: 蠟燭形狀: 圓柱形; 蛋; 橢圓; 圓頭; 方頭; 其他
ko: 양초 모양: 원통형; 계란; 타원; 라운드; 스퀘어; 기타
nb: Lysform: Sylindrisk; Egg; Ellipse; Rund; Firkantet; Annen
pl: Kształt świecy: Cylindryczne; Jajka; Elipsa; Runda; Kwadrat; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Formato da vela: Cilíndrico; Ovo; Elipse; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
th: รูปร่างเทียน: ทรงกระบอก; ทรงไข่; วงรี; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; อื่นๆ
nl: Vorm kaars: Cilindrisch; Ei; Ellips; Rond; Vierkant; Andere
ro-RO: Formă lumânare: Cilindrică; Ou; Elipsă; Rotundă; Pătrată; Altele
vi: Hình nến: Hình trụ; Quả trứng; Hình elip; Mũi giày tròn; Mũi giày vuông; Khác
el: Σχήμα κεριού: Κυλινδρικό; Αυγό; Ελλιπτικό; Στρογγυλό; Τετράγωνο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Formato da vela: Cilíndrico; Ovo; Elipse; Redondo; Quadrado; Outro
sv: Form på ljus: Cylindriskt; Ägg; Ellips; Rund; Fyrkantig; Annat
ja: キャンドル形状: 円筒形; 卵; 楕円; ラウンド; スクエア; その他
it: Forma di candela: Cilindrico; Ovoidale; Ellittica; Rotondo; Quadrata; Altro
en: Candle shape: Cylindrical; Egg; Ellipse; Round; Square; Other
fi: Kynttilän muoto: Lieriömäinen; Kananmuna; Ellipsi; Pyöreä; Neliömäinen; Muu
hr-HR: Oblik svijeće: Cilindrični; Jaje; Elipsa; Okrugla; Kvadratna; Ostalo
lt-LT: Žvakės forma: Cilindrinė; Kiaušinis; Elipsė; Apvali; Kvadratinė; Kita
es: Forma de la vela: Cilíndrico; Huevo; Elipse; Redondo; Cuadrado; Otros
ru: Форма свечи: Цилиндрический; Яйцо; Эллипс; Круг; Квадрат; Другое
bg-BG: Форма на свещ: Цилиндрична; Яйце; Елипса; Кръгла; Квадратна; Други
sk-SK: Tvar sviečky: Valcový; Vajíčko; Elipsa; Okrúhly; Štvorcový; Iné
hu: Gyertya alakja: Henger; Tojás; Ellipszis; Kerek; Négyszögletes; Egyéb
tr: Mum şekli: Silindirik; Yumurta; Elips; Yuvarlak; Kare; Diğer
da: Stearinlysform: Cylindrisk; Æg; Ellipse; Rund; Firkant; Andet
cs: Tvar savičky: Válcový; Vejce; Elipsa; Oválná; Čtvercová; Jiné
de: Kerzenform: Zylindrisch; Ei; Ellipse; Rund; Quadrat; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 蜡烛形状: 圆柱形; 蛋; 椭圆; 圆头; 方形; 其他